Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 6. Administration of Program.

§ 51.1-1136.
Limitation on coverage.

No person shall have more than one coverage under a disability benefit program. Any person employed in more than one position which provides coverage under a disability benefit program shall elect one position on which his coverage shall be based by written notification to the Board. No person shall receive more than one disability benefit under this chapter at the same time.

History.

1998, c. 774; 2000, c. 889.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889 added the last sentence.

§ 51.1-1137.
Keeping records and furnishing information required by Board.

Each employer whose employees are covered under the provisions of this chapter shall keep records and furnish information required by the Board.

History.

1998, c. 774.

§ 51.1-1138.
Benefits exempt from process.

The benefits provided for in this chapter and all proceeds therefrom shall be exempt from levy, garnishment, attachment, and other legal process.

History.

1998, c. 774.

§ 51.1-1139.
Policies to provide for accounting to Board; advance premium deposit reserve.

Each insurance product purchased by the Board or contract for administrative services related to a self-funded product shall provide for an accounting to the Board not later than 120 days after the end of each product year. For an insurance product, the accounting shall include (i) the amounts of premiums actually accrued under the policy during the policy year, (ii) the total amount of all claim charges incurred during the policy year, and (iii) the amount of fees accrued under the policy during the year plus the total amount of all claim charges incurred during the policy year. For a self-insured product, the accounting shall include the total amount of all claim charges incurred during the product year, the total amount of third party administrator expenses, and the total amount of other charges for administrative services.

Any portion of the excess of the total of clause A (i) over clause A (iii) may, with the approval of the Board, be held by the insurance company in an advance premium deposit reserve to be used by the company for charges under the policy only. Any expenses incurred by the Board in connection with the administration of the disability benefits provisions of the program may be deducted from the advance premium deposit reserve. The advance premium deposit reserve shall bear interest at a rate to be determined in advance of each policy year by the insurance company. The rate shall be subject to Board approval as being consistent with the rates generally used by the company for similar funds held under other disability insurance policies. Any portion of the excess not held by the insurance company shall be held by the Board to be used for charges under the policy only. If the Board determines that the advance premium deposit reserve, together with any portion of the excess accumulated and held by the Board, has attained an amount estimated to make satisfactory provision for adverse fluctuations in future charges under the policy, any further excess shall inure to the benefit of the Commonwealth as determined by the Board.

For purposes of this section, the insurance company may combine and consolidate the policies issued by it as directed by the Board.

History.

1998, c. 774; 2006, c. 641.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 641, in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “insurance product” for “policy,” inserted “or contract for administrative services related to a self-funded product” and substituted “product year” for “policy year,” substituted “For an insurance product” for “The” in the second sentence, substituted the language beginning “amount of fees” and ending “the policy year” for “amounts of the insurer’s expenses and risk charges for the policy year” in clause (iii), and added the last sentence; and substituted “clause” for “the sum of clauses A (ii) and” in subsection B.

§ 51.1-1140.
Funding of program; Disability Insurance Trust Fund established.

The costs of providing sick leave, family and personal leave, and short-term disability benefits shall be paid by state agencies from funds as shall be appropriated by law to state agencies.

State agencies shall pay to the Board, from funds as shall be appropriated by law to state agencies, contribution amounts, to be determined by the Board, to provide the Board with such funds as shall be required from time to time to (i) obtain and maintain long-term disability insurance policies under this chapter, and (ii) administer the Program, including providing case management and cost containment programs. Contributions shall be deposited in the Disability Insurance Trust Fund.

There is hereby established the Disability Insurance Trust Fund. The costs incurred by the Board in providing policies of long-term disability insurance and administering the Program and in administering the long-term care insurance program established under §

51.1-1135.2

, including the provision of case management and cost containment programs, shall be withdrawn from time to time by the Board from the Disability Insurance Trust Fund. The funds of the Disability Insurance Trust Fund shall be deemed separate and independent trust funds, shall be segregated from all other funds of the Commonwealth, and shall be invested and administered solely in the interests of the participating employees and beneficiaries thereof. Neither the General Assembly nor any public officer, employee, or agency shall use or authorize the use of such trust funds for any purpose other than as provided in law for benefits, refunds, and administrative expenses, including but not limited to legislative oversight of the Disability Insurance Trust Fund.

History.

1998, c. 774; 2002, cc. 663, 697.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 663 and 697 are identical, and inserted “and in administering the long-term care insurance program established under §

51.1-1135.2

” in the second sentence in subsection C.